Hawaii statutes.
§321-82 Field nutritionist, rural Oahu.
The director of health may appoint a field nutritionist for rural Oahu and
establish, or arrange for the establishing of, a suitable office therefor. [L
1951, c 305, §1; RL 1955, §46-23; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §321-82]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next